Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-502.05
Pregnant women; syphilis test; cost; paid from Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund, when.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost of a serological test for syphilis pursuant to section 71-502.03 for an individual covered under the Medical Assistance Act, when such test was not covered under the act prior to September 3, 2025, shall be paid from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund pursuant to section 68-996 and federal funds.

Laws 2025, LB41, § 2.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.